Hawaii statutes.
§432:1-402 Investments of certain mutual
benefit societies. No domestic mutual benefit society promising or
offering to pay death, sick, disability, or other benefits in an amount equal
to or in excess of $25 shall invest any of its assets other than as authorized
and provided for in respect to domestic insurance companies and societies under
the provisions of article 6 of the insurance code, which provisions are hereby
extended to and made applicable to the mutual benefit societies. [L 1987, c
347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next